Hawaii, session 2026, HB2446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that wage theft remains a persistent problem in Hawaii, disproportionately impacting low‑wage, immigrant, and other vulnerable workers. Although existing law provides strong wage and hour protections, enforcement remains primarily complaint‑driven, limiting effectiveness when workers face language barriers, fear retaliation, or lack access to trusted reporting channels. The legislature further finds that community‑based enforcement partnerships have proven effective in increasing compliance, improving detection of violations, and strengthening worker trust without expanding regulatory burdens on compliant employers. The purpose of this Act is to supplement existing enforcement under the wage and hour law by authorizing the department of labor and industrial relations to partner with trusted community‑based organizations to enhance outreach, referrals, and the recovery of stolen wages. SECTION 2.  Chapter 387, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§387-     Community wage theft enforcement partnership program.  (a)  The department may establish a community wage theft enforcement partnership program to support enforcement of this chapter. (b) Under the community wage theft enforcement partnership program, the department may enter into contracts or memoranda of agreement with community-based organizations to: (1)  Provide education to workers regarding wage and hour rights under this chapter; (2)  Assist workers in documenting potential wage and hour violations; (3)  Refer suspected violations to the wage standards division for investigation; and (4)  Provide navigation and language-access support during the enforcement process. (c)  Community-based organizations participating in the program shall not conduct investigations or exercise enforcement authority. (d)  Information obtained through the community wage theft enforcement partnership program may be used by the department to initiate or support investigations, audits, or enforcement actions under this chapter. (e)  No employer shall retaliate against an employee for participating in, or receiving assistance through, the community wage theft enforcement partnership program.  Retaliation shall be subject to penalties and remedies pursuant to section 387-12. (f)  The department shall submit an annual report describing activities of the community wage theft enforcement partnership program, including the number of partnerships established, workers assisted, and wages recovered to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. (g)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, delay, or replace the department's existing enforcement authority or complaint intake process. (h)  For purposes of this section, "community-based organization" means a nonprofit corporation incorporated in the State that is organized and controlled by either a geographic community, a community of identity, or a community of interest and that is directly involved in community-based economic development activities that demonstrated experience serving low-wage or vulnerable worker populations and has the capacity to protect confidentiality." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the community wage theft enforcement partnership program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of labor and industrial relations for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________